Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 5
PERSONAL RESPONSIBILITY AND EMPLOYMENT DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM

26-2-501 to 26-2-510. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire part repealed, p. 1239, § 31, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This part 5 was added in 1993. For amendments to this part 5 prior to its repeal in 1997, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.